Louisiana, session 2026, HB1200.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:100.201(C), 462.1(A)(3) and (B), 462.2, 462.3, 462.4(A) through
(F), and 462.5(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 39:462.1(A)(4) is hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§100.201. Political Subdivision Federal Grant Assistance Fund
* * *
C. Monies in the fund shall be used for the administration of a program to
assist political subdivisions with competitive federal grant opportunities made
pursuant to the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, P.L. 117-58 or for the
purposes of administering loans or serving as principal for loans made by the State
Infrastructure Bank or Rural Infrastructure Revolving Loan Program.
* * *
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1200 ENROLLED
§462.1. Louisiana Rural Infrastructure Revolving Loan Program; purposes
A. The legislature finds that:
* * *
(3) There is a critical need to increase investment in the development and
maintenance of Louisiana’s physical infrastructure, including facilities related to
water, energy, and hazard mitigation in order to grow the economy and sustain the
state’s vital infrastructure.
(3) (4) The most effective way of accomplishing the goal of providing for
local infrastructure project financing and for preservation of while preserving the
state fisc and protecting taxpayers over the long term is to establish a low-interest-
rate revolving loan fund to be available for local infrastructure projects and
reinvesting repayments into future infrastructure projects as to provide an alternative
means to fund appropriate local infrastructure projects that would otherwise compete
with scarce state funding for state projects.
B. To continue to provide required funding for the planning, design,
construction, and maintenance connected with needed infrastructure projects, it is the
purpose of this Chapter to provide for the establishment and administration of a
program to make loans from a revolving loan fund to assist eligible local
governments in funding eligible infrastructure projects and enter into cooperative
endeavor agreements and interstate compacts as may be necessary and proper to
fulfill the purposes of this Chapter.
§462.2. Louisiana Rural Infrastructure Revolving Loan Program; definitions
The following terms as used in this Chapter shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Approved infrastructure program" means a program through which an
eligible infrastructure project may be funded including but not limited to the
following programs:
(a) State Capital Outlay Budget Program as provided in R.S. 39:101 et seq.,
administered by the division of administration, office of facility planning and
control.
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1200 ENROLLED
(b) Clean Water State Revolving Fund established pursuant to R.S. 30:2301
et seq.
(c) Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund established pursuant to R.S.
40:2821 et seq.
(2) "Certifying department" means a state department or agency with
authority to administer and permit or approve an eligible infrastructure project in
accordance with laws and regulations governing the respective approved
infrastructure program eligible infrastructure program. The State Bond Commission
is shall be the certifying department for emergency requests.
(3) (2) "Commission" means the State Bond Commission.
(4) (3) "Department" means the Department of the Treasury.
(5) (4) "Eligible infrastructure project" or "project" means a plan or proposal
approved by the respective certifying department which would require or use a local
match or other required local contribution or require funding for eligible
infrastructure project costs that can be provided by the commission. "Eligible
infrastructure project" includes an emergency request activities undertaken to plan,
design, construct, repair, maintain, or improve any of the following facilities or
infrastructure located within a local governmental subdivision with a population of
less than fifty thousand according to the latest federal decennial census for the
benefit of the public, and which have been recommended, permitted, or approved by
the applicable certifying department:
(a) Facilities or infrastructure for the treatment or distribution of drinking
water, the treatment of wastewater, and drainage.
(b) Facilities or infrastructure relating to energy production, transmission,
or distribution, including projects for grid modernization and resilience.
(c) Activities intended to mitigate hazards to existing facilities or
infrastructure, or for the safety, health, and welfare of the people of Louisiana,
including those activities intended to reduce or eliminate damage caused by natural
disasters, improve or facilitate recovery, or protect critical services.
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1200 ENROLLED
(d) Activities at other public facilities or infrastructure intended to enhance
economic development, public safety, or quality of life.
(e) Emergency requests, as defined in this Section.
(6) (5) "Emergency request" means a project request submitted by a local
government to recommended, permitted, or approved by a certifying department
between legislative sessions that is essential to alleviate conditions that are hazardous
to life, health, or property. "Emergency request" includes but is not limited to
funding for a project that has projects having an anticipated useful life of less than
twenty years and a value or cost of less than fifty thousand dollars and that would not
otherwise qualify for funding in an approved infrastructure program one hundred
fifty thousand dollars for a local governmental subdivision with a population of
fifteen thousand or less according to the latest federal decennial census and a value
or cost of less than the contract limit provided for in R.S. 38:2212(C)(1) for a local
governmental subdivision with a population of more than fifteen thousand persons
but less than or equal to fifty thousand persons according to the latest federal
decennial census.
(7) (6) "Loan" means the loan from the commission to the local government
provision of funding to a qualified borrower for all or part of the costs of an eligible
infrastructure project in exchange for corresponding obligations, including
repayment, owed by the qualified borrower to the lender, evidenced by a bond, note,
or other evidence of indebtedness as provided in this Chapter. A loan may include
any necessary matching funds required for the project. The maximum amount of a
loan that may be funded through the revolving loan fund is one million five hundred
thousand dollars.
(8) (7) "Local governmental subdivision" for purposes of this Chapter means
a local governmental subdivision as defined in Article VI, Section 44 of the
Constitution of Louisiana.
(8) "Office" means the office of rural development within the office of the
governor.
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1200 ENROLLED
(9) "Local" or "local government" "Political subdivision" for purposes of this
Chapter means a political subdivision as defined in Article VI, Section 44 of the
Constitution of Louisiana which has a population of less than fifteen thousand
according to the latest federal decennial census. A local government shall be limited
to one loan from the revolving loan fund until the loan is paid in full.
(10) "Qualified borrower" means any of the following:
(a) A political subdivision authorized to undertake, construct, operate, or
own an eligible infrastructure project.
(b) Any private entity, including a concessionaire or special purpose entity,
participating in an eligible infrastructure project with the approval or consent of the
relevant regulatory or technical agencies, including but not limited to participants in
a public-private partnership, to the extent permitted by applicable law, provided that
the office determines that the assistance is adequately secured.
(9) (11) "Revolving loan fund" means the Louisiana Rural Infrastructure
Revolving Loan Program Fund established in R.S. 39:462.3.
§462.3. Louisiana Rural Infrastructure Revolving Loan Program Fund
A. There is hereby established a revolving loan fund in the state treasury to
be known as the "Louisiana Rural Infrastructure Revolving Loan Program Fund",
hereinafter referred to in this Chapter as the "fund", which shall be maintained and
operated by the department office. The source of monies deposited in and credited
to the fund shall be all grants, gifts, and donations received by the state for the
purpose of funding capitalizing the fund; any money appropriated by the legislature
to the fund; the repayment repayments of principal of and interest on loans and other
obligations made to local governments qualified borrowers financed from the fund;
administrative fees; and other revenues as may be provided by law.
B. Money in the fund shall be invested in a separate fund by the state
treasurer in the same manner as money in the state general fund. Interest earned on
the investment of the money in the fund shall be credited to the fund after
compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1200 ENROLLED
Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund. All unexpended and
unencumbered money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund.
C. The repayment of principal of and interest on loans and other obligations
made to local governments qualified borrowers financed from the fund shall be
deposited into the fund and may be used to finance loans and obligations for projects
of other local governments qualified borrowers if reserves for expenditures for the
administration of the fund that the department office deems necessary and prudent
are retained in the fund.
D. The department office may, by suit, action, mandamus, or other
proceedings, protect and enforce any covenant relating to and the security provided
in connection with any indebtedness issued pursuant to this Chapter and may, by
suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, enforce and compel performance of
all duties required to be performed by the governing body and officials of any
qualified borrower and in any proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds or other
evidences of indebtedness.
E. The department office shall promulgate rules and regulations in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, as are necessary, for the
following:
(1) To adopt a schedule of reasonable fees and charges to pay for the costs
of administering the fund.
(2) To respond to emergency requests and to consider loan applications for
eligible emergency projects, that have including projects with an anticipated useful
life of less than twenty years and a value or cost of less than fifty thousand dollars.
the contract limit provided for in R.S. 38:2212(C)(1).
(3) Establish program rules and underwriting standards pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, including risk management policies, portfolio
concentration limits, and procedures for default and remedies. The procedures may
also include stress testing requirements and loss-reserve requirements consistent with
those applicable to commercial banks.
(3) (4) To implement the provisions of this Chapter.
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1200 ENROLLED
F. The department office may enter into contracts and other agreements in
connection with the operation of the fund or enter into contracts or agreements to
implement the provisions of this Chapter including but not limited to entering into
cooperative endeavor agreements with third parties.
G. The office may establish advisory committees, including a technical
review committee comprised of representatives from the Department of
Environmental Quality, the Department of Conservation and Energy, the Department
of the Treasury, the Louisiana Department of Health, and Louisiana Economic
Development, to provide recommendations on project eligibility, readiness for
advancement, potential economic development benefits, and environmental
compliance.
H. The office shall establish and maintain accounts in the fund sufficient to
do all of the following:
(1) Segregate funds by program requirements and prohibit commingling.
(2) Segregate state and local funds by infrastructure sector as necessary to
meet statutory, bond, or program conditions.
(3) Establish reserve accounts, debt service accounts, credit risk accounts,
and other accounts as needed for prudent financial management and leveraging.
§462.4. Revolving loan fund; eligibility requirements; loans for eligible
infrastructure projects; authorizing and issuing debt; security; interest rates;
tax exemption
A.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and in addition
to the authority to lend or borrow money or incur or guarantee indebtedness provided
by any other provision of law, sums on deposit in and credited to the fund may be
loaned to local governments for use in connection with eligible infrastructure
projects. However, this Section shall not be deemed to be the exclusive authority
under which a local government may borrow money or incur indebtedness. The
granting of a loan to any political subdivision or qualified borrower pursuant to the
provisions of this Chapter shall be subject to approval by the commission.
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1200 ENROLLED
(2) In order for a local government political subdivision to be eligible for a
loan pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter, the local government it shall comply
with all of the following:
(a) The local government political subdivision shall demonstrate that it has
financial resources and a financial strategy for the duration of the lifecycle of the
project to ensure that the project is sufficiently funded, maintained, and replaced as
needed.
(b) The local government political subdivision shall be in good standing and
comply with the audit requirements provided for in R.S. 24:513 at the time that the
local government political subdivision applies for and receives the loan as well as
during the duration of the term of the loan.
(3) A local government is limited to one loan from the revolving loan fund;
however, once all of the principal, interest, and any other fees and obligations due
under the loan agreement are paid in full, the local government may apply for a new
loan from the revolving loan fund. If the monies in the fund are sufficient to satisfy
the demand for loans to qualified borrowers, preference shall be given to qualified
borrowers who have no outstanding loans from the program.
(4) No loan shall be made nor debt evidencing the loan be issued or incurred
without the approval of the commission.
B. All bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of any local
government qualified borrower issued to represent in connection with a loan shall be
authorized and issued pursuant to include evidence of the qualified borrower's
authority to enter into the transaction as follows:
(1) For political subdivisions, a resolution or ordinance of the governing
authority of that entity, hereinafter referred to collectively as "resolution". The
resolution shall prescribe prescribing the form and details thereof, including the
terms, security for, manner of execution, repayment schedule, and redemption
features thereof, and the of the indebtedness. The resolution may provide that an
officer of the entity may execute in connection with the obligation any related
contract, including but not limited to a credit enhancement device, indenture of trust,
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1200 ENROLLED
loan agreement, pledge agreement, or other agreement or contract needed to
accomplish the purposes for which the evidence of indebtedness is given, in
substantially the form referenced in the resolution, but which final executed credit
enhancement device, indenture of trust, loan agreement, pledge agreement, or other
contract or agreement may contain changes, additions, and deletions as shall in the
sole opinion of the executing officer be appropriate under the circumstances. The
resolution shall include a statement as to the maximum principal amount of any
obligation; the maximum interest rate to be incurred or borne by the obligation or
guaranteed by the obligation; the maximum redemption premium, if any; and the
maximum term in years for the obligation, guarantee, or pledge.
(2) For private entities, evidence of authorization to enter into a binding
commitment for repayment accompanied by evidence of the recommendation,
permitting, or approval of the project by a certifying department. Written evidence
of authority of the person binding the private entity shall be provided.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a local
government political subdivision, upon entering into a loan as provided in this
Chapter, may dedicate and pledge a portion of any revenues it has available to be
pledged and dedicated, including but not limited to revenues from the general
revenue fund, sales taxes, sewer user fees, assessments, parcel fees, or ad valorem
property taxes, for a sufficient term to repay the principal of, interest on, and any
premium, administrative fee, or other fee or cost incurred in connection with the
loan.
D. Any evidence of indebtedness authorized pursuant to this Chapter shall
bear a rate or rates of interest that shall not exceed the rate or rates set forth in the
resolution authorizing and providing for the issuance thereof. Any rate or rates of
interest may be fixed, variable, or adjustable rates.
E. The general laws of the state governing fully registered securities of
public entities shall be applicable to the bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness issued pursuant to this Chapter.
Page 9 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1200 ENROLLED
F. A resolution of a political subdivision authorizing a loan pursuant to this
Section shall be published once in the political subdivision's official journal or in a
newspaper of general circulation in the parish or local government entity incurring
the loan within the boundaries of the local governmental subdivision where the
project is located. It shall not be necessary to publish exhibits to the resolution, but
the exhibits shall be made available for public inspection at the offices of the
governing authority of the parish, municipality, or other political subdivision at
reasonable times, and notice of the availability of these documents shall be stated in
the publication within the official journal or newspaper of general circulation in the
parish or local government entity incurring of the resolution authorizing the loan.
For a period of thirty days after the date of publication, any person in interest may
contest the legality of the resolution authorizing the evidence of indebtedness or
other loan and any provision thereof made for the security and payment of the debt.
After the thirty-day period, no one shall have any cause or right of action to contest
the regularity, formality, legality, or effectiveness of the resolution and or the
provisions thereof, or of the bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness or other
loan, or to provide for the payment of the debt, or the legality thereof, and all of the
provisions of the resolution and evidence of indebtedness shall be conclusively
presumed valid, and no court shall have authority or jurisdiction to inquire into the
matter securing the loan.
* * *
§462.5. General power to issue and incur debt; guarantees of the debt of other
entities
A. The commission, on behalf of the state, may issue, incur, and deliver debt
evidenced by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, payable from or
secured by sums deposited in, credited to, or to be received by the commission in
order to provide monies for deposit into the fund. The commission may undertake
and issue and deliver evidences of its guarantee of the debt of other entities and may
enter into and execute pledges of the sums deposited in, credited to, or to be received
by the commission, including payments pursuant to letters of credit, to secure the
Page 10 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1200 ENROLLED
debt or performance of obligations of a local government qualified borrower for a
project. Bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, guarantees, and pledges
issued and delivered pursuant to this authority shall constitute special and limited
obligations of the commission and shall not be secured by the full faith and credit of
the state or any source of revenue of the state other than those sums on deposit in or
credited to the revolving loan fund, or to be received by the commission, including
payments to be made pursuant to letters of credit. Debt issued pursuant to the
provisions of this Chapter shall be deemed to be in compliance with the provisions
of Article VII, Section 14 of the Constitution of Louisiana.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 11 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.